ro-RO: Standardul de certificare de siguranță al căștii: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazilia); SABS (Africa de Sud); SG (Japonia); Evaluat SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Altele
nb: Sikkerhetssertifiseringsstandard for hjelm: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasil); SABS (Sør-Afrika); SG (Japan); SHARP-klassifisert; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Annet
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองความปลอดภัยของหมวกกันน็อค: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (อินเดีย); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (บราซิล); SABS (แอฟริกาใต้); SG (ญี่ปุ่น); มาตรฐาน SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 头盔安全认证标准: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI（印度）; JIS T 8133; NBR 7471（巴西）; SABS (南非); SG (日本); SHARP 评级; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; 其他
ko: 헬멧 안전 인증 표준: AS/NZS 1698; DOT(FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI(인도); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471(브라질); SABS(남아프리카); SG(일본); SHARP 등급; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; 기타
pl: Norma certyfikacji bezpieczeństwa kasku: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indie); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazylia); SABS (RPA); SG (Japonia); Z oceną SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Inny
da: Standard for certificering af hjelmsikkerhed: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indien); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasilien); SABS (Sydafrika); SG (Japan); SHARP-klassificeret; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Andet
hr-HR: Standard certificiranja zaštitne kacige: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indija); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazil); SABS (Južnoafrička Republika); SG (Japan); S certifikatom SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Ostalo
de: Standard der Sicherheitszertifizierung des Helms: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indien); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasilien); SABS (Südafrika); SG (Japan); SHARP-geprüft; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Sonstige
pt-PT: Norma de certificação de segurança do capacete: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Índia); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasil); SABS (África do Sul); SG (Japão); Classificação SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Outro
hu: Sisak biztonsági tanúsítási szabványa: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazília); SABS (Dél-Afrika); SG (Japán); SHARP-minősítésű; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Egyéb
fr: Norme de certification de sécurité des casques: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Inde); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brésil); SABS (Afrique du Sud); SG (Japon); Homologué SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Autre
en: Helmet safety certification standard: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazil); SABS (South Africa); SG (Japan); SHARP rated; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Other
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης ασφάλειας κράνους: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Ινδία); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Βραζιλία); SABS (Νότια Αφρική); SG (Ιαπωνία); Με αξιολόγηση SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Άλλο
fi: Kypärän turvallisuussertifiointistandardi: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Intia); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasilia); SABS (Etelä-Afrikka); SG (Japani); SHARP-luokiteltu; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Muu
sk-SK: Bezpečnostná certifikačná norma prilby: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazília); SABS (Južná Afrika); SG (Japonsko); Hodnotenie SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Iné
zh-TW: 安全帽安全認證標準: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (印度); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (巴西); SABS (南非); SG (日本); SHARP 認證; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; 其他
sv: Säkerhetsstandard för hjälm: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indien); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasilien); SABS (Sydafrika); SG (Japan); SHARP-klassad; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Övrigt
sl-SI: Standard za certificiranje na področju varnosti za čelade: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indija); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazilija); SABS (Južna Afrika); SG (Japonska); Ocenjeno s SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Drugo
ru: Стандарт сертификации безопасности шлема: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Индия); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Бразилия); SABS (ЮАР); SG (Япония); Сертификат SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Другое
nl: Certificeringsnorm helmveiligheid: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazilië); SABS (Zuid-Afrika); SG (Japan); SHARP-beoordeeld; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Overig
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация за безопасност на каска: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Индия); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Бразилия); SABS (Южна Африка); SG (Япония); Сертификат SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Други
tr: Kask güvenlik sertifikasyon standard: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Hindistan); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brezilya); SABS (Güney Afrika); SG (Japonya); SHARP dereceli; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Diğer
pt-BR: Norma de certificação de segurança do capacete: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Índia); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasil); SABS (África do Sul); SG (Japão); Com classificação SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Outro
lt-LT: Šalmo saugos sertifikavimo standartas: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indija); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazilija); SABS (Pietų Afrika); SG (Japonija); SHARP įvertinimas; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Kita
it: Standard di certificazione di sicurezza del casco: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasile); SABS (Sudafrica); SG (Giappone); Classificazione SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Altro
cs: Norma pro certifikaci bezpečnosti přileb: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Indie); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazílie); SABS (Jižní Afrika); SG (Japonsko); Hodnocení SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Jiný
es: Estándar de certificación de seguridad del casco: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (India); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brasil); SABS (Sudáfrica); SG (Japón); Con clasificación SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Otro
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận an toàn của mũ bảo hiểm: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (Ấn Độ); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (Brazil); SABS (Nam Phi); SG (Nhật Bản); Xếp hạng SHARP; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; Khác
ja: ヘルメット安全認証標準: AS/NZS 1698; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM FRHPhe-01; FIM FRHPhe-02; ISI (インド); JIS T 8133; NBR 7471 (ブラジル); SABS (南アフリカ); SG (日本); SHARP 認定; Snell M2015; Snell M2020; その他